Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.600.130

Washington scholars' program—Planning committee—Composition—Duties.

The office of student financial assistance shall establish a planning committee to develop criteria for screening and selection of the Washington scholars each year in accordance with RCW 28A.600.110(1). It is the intent that these criteria shall emphasize scholastic achievement but not exclude such criteria as leadership ability and community contribution in final selection procedures. The Washington scholars planning committee shall have members from selected state agencies and private organizations having an interest and responsibility in education, including but not limited to, the office of superintendent of public instruction, the council of presidents, the state board for community and technical colleges, and the Washington friends of higher education.

[ 2011 1st sp.s. c 11 s 127; 2006 c 263 s 916; 1995 1st sp.s. c 5 s 1; 1990 c 33 s 500; 1985 c 370 s 33; 1981 c 54 s 4. Formerly RCW 28A.58.826.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2011 1st sp.s. c 11 ss 101-103, 106-202, 204-244, and 301: See note following RCW 28B.76.020.

Intent—2011 1st sp.s. c 11: See note following RCW 28B.76.020.

Findings—Purpose—Part headings not law—2006 c 263: See notes following RCW 28A.150.230.

Severability—1995 1st sp.s. c 5: "If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 1995 1st sp.s. c 5 s 5.]

Effective date—1995 1st sp.s. c 5: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and shall take effect July 1, 1995." [ 1995 1st sp.s. c 5 s 6.]

Severability—1981 c 54: See note following RCW 28A.600.100.